New Jersey, session 222, S2913.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, a carrier issuing, executing, or renewing a dental plan in this State shall be prohibited from providing a plan to a covered person with a dental benefit waiting period. b.    For the purposes of this section, dental benefit waiting period means a provision within a dental plan that delays the eligibility of a covered person to receive certain covered services under the plan. 2.    This act shall take effect on the 30th day next following enactment, and shall apply to dental plans issued, executed, or renewed on or after that date.